Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 13 Simultaneous Death

Cross references. —

As to survivorship upon simultaneous death, see §

2-7-101

.

For provision that if a person presumed dead owned property, real or personal, in the state, administration of the estate of such person may be had in a manner provided by law, see §

2-7-101

.

As to rights of survivors generally, see §§

2-9-101

to

2-9-103

.

Law reviews. —

For a note on the disposition of property under the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act, see 1 Wyo. L.J. 126.

See note, “The Uniform Simultaneous Death Act and Its Effect on Jointly Owned Property,” 15 Wyo. L.J. 229.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

22 Am. Jur. 2d Death § 43.

Construction, application and effect of Uniform Simultaneous Death Act, 39 ALR3d 1332.

25A C.J.S. Death §§ 6 to 7, 15 to 16.

§ 2-13-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform Simultaneous Death Act”.

“This act”, when used in chapter 13 of the Probate Code, means W.S.

2-13-101

through

2-13-107

.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 94, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 6-2517; W.S. 1957, § 34-100; W.S. 1977, §

34-7-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-13-102.
Applicability of provisions.

This act does not apply in the case of wills, living trusts, deeds or contracts of insurance wherein provision is made for distribution of property different from the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 94, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 6-2515; W.S. 1957, § 34-101; W.S. 1977, § 34-7-102; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-13-101

.

§ 2-13-103.
Disposition of property based on presumption of survivorship.

Where the title to property or the devolution thereto depends upon priority of death and there is no sufficient evidence that the persons have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property of each person shall be disposed of as if he had survived, except as provided otherwise in this act.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 94, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-2511; W.S. 1957, § 34-102; W.S. 1977, § 34-7-103; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-13-101

.

§ 2-13-104.
Beneficiaries.

Where two (2) or more beneficiaries are designated to take successively by reason of survivorship under another person’s disposition of property and there is no sufficient evidence that these beneficiaries have died otherwise than simultaneously the property thus disposed of shall be divided into as many equal portions as there are successively beneficiaries and those portions shall be distributed respectively to those who would have taken in the event that each designated beneficiary had survived.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 94, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 6-2512; W.S. 1957, § 34-103; W.S. 1977, § 34-7-104; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-13-105.
Joint tenants or tenants by the entirety.

Where there is no sufficient evidence that two (2) joint tenants or tenants by the entirety have died otherwise than simultaneously the property so held shall be distributed one-half (1/2) as if one (1) had survived and one-half (1/2) as if the other had survived. If there are more than two (2) joint tenants and all of them have so died the property thus distributed shall be in the proportion that one (1) bears to the whole number of joint tenants.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 94, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 6-2513; W.S. 1957, § 34-104; W.S. 1977, § 34-7-105; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-13-106.
Life or accident insurance proceeds.

Where the insured and the beneficiary in a policy of life or accident insurance have died and there is no sufficient evidence that they have died otherwise than simultaneously the proceeds of the policy shall be distributed as if the insured had survived the beneficiary.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 94, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 6-2514; W.S. 1957, § 34-105; W.S. 1977, § 34-7-106; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-13-107.
Construction and interpretation.

This act shall be so construed and interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law in those states which enact it.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 94, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 6-2516; W.S. 1957, § 34-106; W.S. 1977, § 34-7-107; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Applicability. —

Section 5, ch. 94, Laws 1941, reads: “This act shall not apply to the distribution of the property of a person who has died before it takes effect.”

Severability. —

Section 10, ch. 94, Laws 1941, reads: “If any of the provisions of this act or the application thereof to any persons or circumstances is held invalid such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 9, ch. 94, Laws 1941, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.